California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12263.

The department shall act on an application for the acquisition of a conservation easement within 180 days of its receipt, and shall notify the applicant in writing of approval or disapproval of the application within 10 days of the decision of the department. The written notice regarding a disapproval decision shall state the reason for the disapproval of the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12264.

The department may disapprove the application for the acquisition of a conservation easement in any of the following circumstances:

(a) The application does not satisfy the eligibility criteria set forth in Section 12251 or selection criteria set forth in Section 12260.

(b) Clear title to the conservation easement cannot be conveyed.

(c) There is insufficient money in the fund to carry out the acquisition.

(d) Other acquisitions have a higher priority.

(e) Other relevant considerations established by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Easement Monitoring and Management [12275. - 12276.]

12275.

The department, local government entity, or nonprofit land trust organization acquiring an easement pursuant to this division shall monitor that easement in order to assess the condition of the resources being protected and to ensure that the terms of the easement are being followed. Entities acquiring easements may also enter into a cooperative agreement with another qualified entity to monitor the easement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12276.

The department shall ensure that any entity acquiring a conservation easement acquired pursuant to this division has adequate funding for, or otherwise adequately provides for, easement monitoring pursuant to this division, and is able to enforce the easement if its provisions are not satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. RESORT IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS [13000. - 13233.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [13000. - 13003.]

13000.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there exists throughout the State large unincorporated areas which are particularly suited to and used for recreation resort purposes, and which are held and used by residents of this State but which are inhabited only seasonally. The Legislature further finds and declares that these resort areas are not suited to full urban development without destroying the very nature of the areas; but the seasonal residents of these areas are, nevertheless, in need of extended governmental services; and that the extension of governmental services and the construction and financing of public improvements in these resort areas is complicated by the facts that: (a) many of the services are needed only seasonally, and (b) most of the landowners whose property is benefited by the public improvements, because they are technically nonresidents, are without voice in the direction or method of financing of the necessary services and improvements. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division to provide an alternative method for the furnishing of extended governmental services, including the construction and financing of public improvements, within recreation resort areas adequate to meet the needs of such areas; and to provide for the levy of taxes within such areas in an amount sufficient to pay for extended services provided, additional extended services to be provided, and for public improvements installed or constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13001.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “Resort Improvement District Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13002.

A resort improvement district consisting of unincorporated territory in one county may be established pursuant to this division, provided that 80 percent or more of the assessed valuation of the land in the district as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll is in nonresident ownership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13003.

No additional districts shall be created or organized under this division after September 17, 1965, except in the Fallen Leaf Lake watershed within the Lake Tahoe watershed. The provisions of Section 13075 shall not apply in the Fallen Leaf Lake watershed within the Lake Tahoe watershed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1281.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [13010. - 13020.]

13010.

The terms defined in this chapter have the meaning set forth unless the context requires a different meaning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13011.

“District” means a district created pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13012.

“District board” means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13013.

“County” means the county in which the district in located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13014.

“Board of supervisors” and “board” means the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13015.

“Charges” includes fees, tolls, rates, and rentals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13016.

“Land” means land in the district and does not include improvements or personal or utility property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13017.

“Legal representative” means an officer or other person or persons appointed to serve as such by the board of directors of a corporation owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13018.

“Owner” means the owner of land as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13019.

“Voter” means a voter, as defined in Section 359 of the Elections Code, who resides within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13020.

“Nonresident landowner” means a person or persons, association, corporation, or partnership owning land within the district but having his actual residence elsewhere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. General Administrative Provisions [13031. - 13041.]

13031.

The board of supervisors is the governing body of the district, and, unless otherwise provided in this division, the provisions of the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code) shall apply to the conduct of the business of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13032.

If deemed advisable by the board of supervisors a board of directors for the district may be formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13033.

The board of directors of any district formed pursuant to this division shall have such powers as the board of supervisors may from time to time give to them. The board of supervisors may grant to the board of directors of the district any powers herein given to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13034.

The district board shall consist either of five members, four of which shall be elected from the district and the fifth which shall be the supervisor who represents the area in which the district or major portion thereof is located; or, if the district so elects, by unanimous vote of the directors, the district board shall consist of five members who shall be elected from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

13034.5.

If a district elects pursuant to Section 13034 to have the district board consist of five members elected from the district, the district board may call a special election for the purpose of electing a district board member to succeed the supervisorial member on the district board. A special election called pursuant to this section shall be called and conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13050) of this division. A person elected to a district board at a special election pursuant to this section shall hold office until the next succeeding general district election and until the election and qualification of his successor. Thereafter, the term of office of such elected board member shall be four years.

If a special election is not called, the successor to the supervisorial member shall be elected at the next general district election.

Any supervisor serving as a district board member when an election is held pursuant to this section shall remain in office until the election and qualification of his successor.

Any district electing to call a special election pursuant to the provisions of this section shall reimburse any local government for any costs incurred by such local government by reason of the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

13035.

Exclusive of the supervisorial member, the directors shall be voters in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13035.1.

The number of directors elected by voters in the district at the first general district election held after January 1, 1998, shall be equal to the number of directors whose terms have expired by the date of that election. Any director whose term has not expired by the date of that election shall continue to serve until the person’s term of office expires and the person’s successor has been elected by the voters in the district. At the first general district election held after January 1, 1998, and at all subsequent general district elections, the form of the ballot and the conduct of the election shall comply with the requirements of the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code) governing resident voting elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 140, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13036.

All vacancies in the office of director shall be filled by appointment by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13037.

An appointment to fill a vacancy in the office of director shall be for the unexpired term of the office in which the vacancy exists, and until the election or appointment of his successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13038.

Once each year, the district board shall elect one of its members to serve as president and shall appoint a secretary, who may be a member of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

13039.

All sessions of the district board shall be public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13040.

The district board by resolution, shall provide for the time and place of its meetings, the manner of calling special meetings and shall establish rules for its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13041.

(a) Any compensation provided pursuant to this section shall comply with Articles 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) and 2.4 (commencing with Section 53234) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) The district board may authorize each director to receive compensation not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25) for each meeting of the board attended by the director within the State of California, not exceeding two meetings in any calendar month, plus reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of these duties.

(c) The district board may authorize a director to receive for performing duties for the
 district other than attending board meetings:

(1) Not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for each day, but payment is limited to five days in any calendar month as to each director other than the president.

(2) Actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of these duties.

(d) The secretary shall receive compensation set by the board, which compensation shall be in lieu of any other compensation to which the secretary may be entitled for attendance at meetings pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 79.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Elections [13050. - 13062.]

13050.

After the authorization of a district board by the board of supervisors, a general district election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in odd-numbered years, commencing with the first odd-numbered year following the formation of the district board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

13050.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, districts governed by this division are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

13051.

A special election may be called by the board to be held at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13052.

The hours during which the polls shall be opened at any special district election shall be as established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

13053.

Notices of elections shall be given as nearly as practicable in accordance with the general laws regarding notices of county election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13058.

Each voter, as defined in Section 13019, shall have one vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

13060.

In the first district board election the two candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be elected for four years, the candidates which are elected receiving the third and fourth highest number of votes shall be elected for two years. After the first district board election the term of office of all district board members, except for the supervisorial member, shall be four years, or until the election or appointment and qualification of his successor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13062.

A majority of the votes cast shall be required to approve a proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Powers [13070. - 13076.]

13070.

The district may acquire, construct, maintain, and operate property, works, and facilities for any one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To supply the inhabitants of the district with water for domestic use, irrigation, sanitation, industrial use, fire protection, and recreation.

(b) The collection, treatment, or disposal of sewage, waste, and storm water of the district and its inhabitants.

(c) To exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties which are vested in, or imposed upon, a fire protection district pursuant to the Fire Protection District Law of 1987, Part 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

If the district includes any part of any local agency which provides fire protection service to any territory in the district, the district shall have no authority regarding the prevention or suppression of fires in that territory unless the district has obtained the consent of the local agency.

(d) Comprehensive planning for the physical growth of the area within the district.

(e) The collection or disposal of garbage or refuse matter.

(f) Public recreation by means of parks, including, but not limited to, acquatic parks and recreational harbors, playgrounds, golf courses, swimming pools, or recreation buildings for all-year recreation, including, but not limited to, facilities for public and private meetings, and other public squares and places.

(g) Street lighting.

(h) Mosquito abatement.

(i) The equipment and maintenance of a police department or other police protection to protect and safeguard life and property.

(j) The opening, widening, extending, straightening, and surfacing, in whole or part, of any street in the district, subject to the consent of the Department of Transportation, with respect to state highways, and local authorities, as defined in Section 385 of the Vehicle Code, with respect to highways under their jurisdiction.

(k) The construction and improvement of bridges, culverts, curbs, gutters, drains, and works incidental to the purposes specified in subdivision (j), subject to the consent of the Department of Transportation, with respect to state highways, and local authorities, as defined in Section 385 of the Vehicle Code, with respect to highways under their jurisdiction.

(l) The construction and maintenance of parking facilities and other transportation facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 45, Sec. 2.   Effective June 15, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

13070.1.

As used in this chapter, “acquire” includes, but is not restricted to, taking by condemnation, purchase, or lease and receiving by donation or dedication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

13071.

The district may hold, use, enjoy, lease or dispose of any of its property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

13072.

Whenever the board determines by resolution that it is feasible, economically sound, and in the public interest, for the district to exercise its powers for any of the purposes specified in Section 13070, and not specified in the resolution establishing the district, the board may call a special district election and submit to the voters of the district, or submit to them at the next general district election, the question of whether the district should adopt such additional purpose or purposes. If a majority of the votes cast at the election upon such proposition shall be in favor of the adoption of such additional purpose or purposes, then the powers of the district may be exercised therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13073.

Bonded indebtedness may be incurred within the district in the manner herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13074.

The board may compel all residents and property owners in the district to connect their houses, habitations and structures requiring sewage or drainage disposal service or a joint water system with the sewer and storm drains or water facilities of the district, and to use district garbage and refuse removal service and facilities. The board may charge reasonable and necessary fees for these services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 789, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

13075.

(a) No district shall engage in any activity or provide any service not already engaged in or provided, or budgeted for, as of July 1, 1970. Whenever any activity or service of a district is terminated, it shall not be reactivated.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), any obligations of a district which are outstanding as of the effective date of this section shall be considered exceptions to subdivision (a) and may be fully performed, and the provisions of this section shall not be construed in any manner so as to impair the contractual rights of any person.

(c) On or before January 1, 1972 the district board shall certify in writing to the Secretary of State any and all activities and services being engaged in or provided, or budgeted for, as of July 1, 1970, and all outstanding obligations of the district as of the effective date of this section, and shall transmit a copy of such certification to the State Controller, which shall be presumptive evidence of the activities authorized to be performed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 301.)
-------------------------------------------

13076.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and in addition to any other powers conferred thereby, Resort Improvement District Number 1, in the County of Humboldt, may produce, purchase, and sell electrical power within the boundaries of the district.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any judicial action or proceeding against the district to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, or motion fixing or changing a rate or charge for an electric commodity or an electric service furnished by the district and adopted on or after July 1, 2000, shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of that ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(c) The statute of limitations set forth in subdivision (b) does not apply to any judicial action or proceeding filed pursuant to Chapter 13.7 (commencing with Section 54999) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code to protest or challenge a rate or charge or to seek the refund of a capital facilities fee if the notice and disclosure requirements of Section 54999.35 of the Government Code have not been followed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 146, Sec. 4.   Effective July 21, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Bonds [13100. - 13129.]

13100.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness, it shall by resolution set forth all of the following:

(a) A declaration of the necessity for the indebtedness.

(b) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred.

(c) The amount of the proposed debt.

(d) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the questions:

(1) Will the whole or a portion of the district be benefited by the accomplishment of the purpose?

(2) If only a portion of the district will be benefited, what portion will be so benefited?

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13101.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication of a copy of the resolution pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation circulated within the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

The copy of the resolution published shall be accompanied by a notice subscribed by the clerk that:

(a) The hearing referred to in the resolution will be had at the time and place specified in the resolution.

(b) At that time and place any person interested, including all persons owning property in the district, will be heard upon the question stated in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing on the resolution declaring the necessity for incurring the bonded indebtedness or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13104.

At the hearing any person interested, including persons owning property within the district, may appear and present any matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution declaring the necessity for incurring the bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13105.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall by resolution determine whether the whole or part of the district will be benefited by the accomplishment of the purpose stated in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13106.

If the board determines that the whole of the district will not be benefited, the resolution shall also describe the portion of the district which will be benefited, in a manner sufficient for identification, which portion of the district described in the resolution shall thereupon constitute and be known as “Improvement Area No. ____” of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13107.

After the formation of an improvement area within the district pursuant to this chapter, all proceedings for the purpose of a bond election within the improvement area and for the purpose of taxation for the payment of the bonds and interest shall be limited, and apply only to the improvement area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13108.

The determination of the board that the whole of the district will be benefited by the bond issue or only that a described portion of the district will be benefited by the bond issue is final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13109.

After the board has made its determination pursuant to Section 13105, if it deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness, it shall by resolution state:

(a) That it deems it necessary to incur the bonded indebtedness.

(b) The purpose for which the bonded indebtedness will be incurred.

(c) Either of the following in accordance with its previous determination:

(1) That the whole of the district will be benefited by incurring the bonded indebtedness.

(2) That a portion of the district will be benefited by incurring the bonded indebtedness, which portion shall be described in the resolution of the board made pursuant to Section 13105.

(d) The amount of debt to be incurred.

(e) The maximum term the bonds to be issued shall run before maturity, which term shall not exceed 40 years.

(f) The annual rate of interest to be paid, which rate shall not exceed 7 percent, payable annually or semiannually, or in part annually and in part semiannually.

(g) The proposition to be submitted to the voters.

(h) The date of the special district election (which may be consolidated with a general election) at which such proposition shall be submitted to the voters; the hours between which the polls shall be open; the boundaries of voting precincts within the area or portion thereof benefited by incurring the bonded indebtedness; the location of polling places; and the names of the officers selected to conduct such election in each precinct, who shall consist of one judge, one inspector and two clerks.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13110.

The resolution provided for in Section 13109 shall constitute the notice of such special bond election and such resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation circulating within the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13111.

The provisions of the Elections Code relating to the qualifications of electors, the manner of voting, the duties of election officers, the canvassing of returns, and all other particulars in respect to the management of general elections so far as they may be applicable shall govern all district elections except:

(a) To the extent that the provisions of the Elections Code pertaining to the conduct of local elections are inconsistent with the provisions of that code pertaining to general elections, the provisions pertaining to local elections shall control.

(b) Inconsistent provisions of this division shall control over any provisions of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

13112.

Every voter within the area designated in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 13109, but no others, may vote on the proposition to authorize the bonds. If the area does not include the entire district, a separate ballot shall be prepared for the vote upon such proposition and only the voters entitled thereto shall be given such ballots.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13113.

A two-thirds vote shall be required for the issuance of general obligation bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13114.

If two-thirds of the vote cast at the election are in favor of incurring the indebtedness, the board may by resolution, at the time or times it deems proper, provide for the following:

(a) The form of the bonds.

(b) The execution of the bonds.

(c) The issuance of any part of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13115.

The bonds shall be signed by the chair of the board and countersigned by the clerk of the board or the clerk’s deputy and the coupons shall be signed by the clerk of the board or the clerk’s deputy. All signatures, except that of the clerk, on the bonds may be printed, lithographed, or engraved. If an officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office. All bonds shall be payable at the office of the county treasurer, who is the depositary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 16.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13116.5.

An action to determine the validity of bonds may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 68, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

13117.

The district may sell the bonds so issued at the times or in the manner the board deems to be to the public interest, provided, that all bonds shall be sold on sealed proposals to the highest bidder. Public notice shall be given in the manner determined by the board. If no bids are received or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13118.

Any bonds issued by any area organized under this division are hereby given the same force, value, and use as bonds issued by any municipality and shall be exempt from all taxation within the state.

All bonds issued by any area payable from taxes are legal investments for all trust funds, for the trust funds of all insurance companies, the state school funds, and any funds that may be invested in bonds of cities, counties, cities and counties, school districts, or municipalities in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 22.5.)
-------------------------------------------

13119.

The board may, by resolution, do the following:

(a) Submit to voters a measure to issue new bonds to refund any or all of the district bonds outstanding.

(b) Submit to the voters of any improvement area a measure to issue new bonds to refund any improvement area bonds outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13120.

The measure may be voted on at any district election or an election may be called for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13121.

The procedure upon the election shall be in accordance, so far as applicable, with the procedure upon an original issue of bonds, except that:

(a) No hearing need be held upon the question whether the bond issue will benefit the entire district or only a portion of it.

(b) A vote of two-thirds of the voters voting upon the measure is sufficient to authorize the issue of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13122.

The refunding bonds may, if the holders of the bonds of an original issue and the board so agree, be exchanged for original bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13123.

The face value of refunding bonds exchanged for original bonds shall not exceed the face value of the original bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13124.

The board may raise money by rates or taxes to pay principal and interest of the refunding bonds in the same manner as prescribed for payment of bonds of an original issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13125.

Any bonds issued by the district may be made callable by resolution of the board adopted at or prior to the time of issuing the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13126.

When bonds are made callable a statement to that effect shall be set forth on the face of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.

Callable bonds may be redeemed on any interest payment date prior to their fixed maturity in such amounts and manner and at such prices as the board may prescribe in the resolution provided for in Section 13125.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13128.

Notice designating the bonds called for redemption shall be published in a newspaper determined by the board to be the one most likely to reach the holders of the bonds. The first publication of the redemption notice shall not be less than 30 nor more than 90 days prior to the date fixed for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13129.

If on the date fixed for redemption the district has provided funds available for payment of the principal and interest of the bonds called, interest on them ceases.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any proceedings for the authorization, issue or sale of revenue bonds of a county service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Revenue Bonds [13140. - 13141.]

13140.

Revenue bonds may be issued by the district for the acquisition and construction, or acquisition or construction of any improvements or property or facilities contained within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13141.

Proceedings for the authorization, issuance, sale, security, and payment of revenue bonds shall be had, the board shall have the powers and duties, and the bondholders shall have the rights and remedies, all in substantial accordance with and with like legal effect as provided in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code; provided, however, that qualified voters at the election therein provided shall be voters as defined in this division, and the method of voting shall be as herein provided. As used therein the word “resolution” shall mean ordinance, the words “local agency” shall mean district, and the words “legislative body” shall mean board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Assessment Bonds [13150. - 13150.]

13150.

The Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000)) of the Streets and Highways Code, the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000)) of the Streets and Highways Code, and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500)) of the Streets and Highways Code, as those acts read on January 1, 1994, or as thereafter amended, are applicable to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Taxation [13160. - 13163.]

13160.

The lien for taxes for the first fiscal year after the district is formed shall attach on the first Monday in March or on the date the district is created, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13161.

The board of supervisors shall at the time and in the manner of levying other county taxes, levy and cause to be collected a tax upon the taxable real and personal property in the district, based upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county, sufficient to pay (a) the interest on bonds for that year, and the portion of the principal that is to become due before the time for making the next general tax levy, and (b) the amount necessary to maintain, operate, extend, or repair any work or improvements within the district, and to defray all other expenses incidental to the exercise of any of the district powers or to pay any existing obligations of the district. The aggregate taxes levied for any one fiscal year, other than those levied to pay the principal and interest on the bonds, shall not exceed one dollar ($1) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation of taxable real and personal property in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13161.5.

A district may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 70, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

13162.

The tax shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the general tax levy for county purposes, and when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the proper district fund, as provided in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 13170). The board shall control and order its expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13163.
